Hawaii statutes.
[§378-27.5] Enforcement jurisdiction;
complaint against unlawful practice. (a) The department shall have
jurisdiction over practices made unlawful by this part. Any prospective
employee or employee claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful practice may file
with the department a verified complaint in writing which shall state the name
and address of the prospective employer or employer alleged to have committed
the unlawful practice complained of and which shall set forth the particulars
thereof and contain such other information as may be required by the
department. The attorney general, or the department upon its own initiative,
in like manner, may make and file such a complaint.

(b) A complaint may be filed on behalf of a
class by the attorney general or the department, and a complaint so filed may
be investigated, conciliated, and litigated on a class action basis.

(c) No complaint shall be filed after the
expiration of thirty days after the date upon which the alleged unlawful
practice occurred or is discovered to have occurred, whichever is later. [L
1985, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next